vim/st.aff
SET UTF-8


FLAG long


FULLSTRIP

ICONV 1
ICONV ' ’

NEEDAFFIX ,,

MAP 6
MAP eéëêè
MAP uüùúû
MAP aâàä
MAP iîïy
MAP cçsz
MAP jg


MIDWORD ·.

SFX u' Y 2
SFX u' e 0 .
SFX u' e ' .


SFX _s Y 1
SFX _s 0 s .



SFX _x Y 3
SFX _x 0 x/ [^l]
SFX _x l ux/ al
SFX _x il ux/ ail




SFX ri Y 6
SFX ri eur·rice rice/_s .eur·rice
SFX ri eur·rice eur/_s eur·rice
SFX ri eur·rice eurice/_s eur·rice
SFX ri eur·rice euricex/_s eur·rice
SFX ri eur·rice eur·rice/_s eur·rice
SFX ri eur·rice eur.rice/_s eur·rice


SFX rs Y 6
SFX rs eur·euse euse/_s .
SFX rs eur·euse eur/_s .
SFX rs eur·euse eureuse/_s .
SFX rs eur·euse eureusex/_s .
SFX rs eur·euse eur·euse/_s .
SFX rs eur·euse eur.euse/_s .


SFX rr Y 4
SFX rr er·ère er/_s .
SFX rr er·ère ère/_s .
SFX rr er·ère er·ère/_s .
SFX rr er·ère er.ère/_s .


SFX xz Y 4
SFX xz eux·euse euse/_s .
SFX xz eux·euse eux .
SFX xz eux·euse eux·euse/_s .
SFX xz eux·euse eux.euse/_s .


SFX fv Y 4
SFX fv f·ve f/_s .
SFX fv f·ve ve/_s .
SFX fv f·ve f·ve/_s .
SFX fv f·ve f.ve/_s .


SFX ue Y 4
SFX ue u·ue u/_s .
SFX ue u·ue üe/_s .
SFX ue u·ue u·ue/_s .
SFX ue u·ue u.ue/_s .


SFX la Y 7
SFX la eau·elle eau .
SFX la eau·elle eaux .
SFX la eau·elle elle/_s .
SFX la eau·elle elleau .
SFX la eau·elle elleaux .
SFX la eau·elle eau·elle/_s .
SFX la eau·elle eau.elle/_s .


SFX ee Y 4
SFX ee ète·sse ète/_s .
SFX ee ète·sse étesse/_s .
SFX ee ète·sse ète·sse/_s .
SFX ee ète·sse ète.sse/_s .


SFX xc Y 4
SFX xc x·ce ce/_s .
SFX xc x·ce x .
SFX xc x·ce x·ce/_s .
SFX xc x·ce x.ce/_s .


SFX xs Y 4
SFX xs x·sse sse/_s .
SFX xs x·sse x .
SFX xs x·sse x·sse/_s .
SFX xs x·sse x.sse/_s .


SFX xl Y 5
SFX xl eux·eille eil/s .
SFX xl eux·eille eille/_s .
SFX xl eux·eille eux .
SFX xl eux·eille eux·eille/_s .
SFX xl eux·eille eux.eille/_s .


SFX ev Y 4
SFX ev ef·ève ef/_s .
SFX ev ef·ève ève/_s .
SFX ev ef·ève ef·ève/_s .
SFX ev ef·ève ef.ève/_s .


SFX ec Y 4
SFX ec ec·èche ec/_s .
SFX ec ec·èche èche/_s .
SFX ec ec·èche ec·èche/_s .
SFX ec ec·èche ec.èche/_s .


SFX _e Y 6
SFX _e ·e /_s .
SFX _e ·e e/_s .
SFX _e ·e ex/_s .
SFX _e ·e xe/_s .
SFX _e ·e ·e/_s .
SFX _e ·e .e/_s .


SFX et Y 5
SFX et et·ète et/_s .
SFX et et·ète et/_s .
SFX et et.ète ète/_s .
SFX et et·ète et·ète/_s .
SFX et et·ète et.ète/_s .


SFX en Y 5
SFX en en·ène /_s .
SFX en en·ène en/_s .
SFX en en·ène ène/_s .
SFX en en·ène en·ène/_s .
SFX en en·ène en.ène/_s .


SFX qc Y 4
SFX qc c·que c/_s .
SFX qc c·que que/_s .
SFX qc c·que c·que/_s .
SFX qc c·que c.que/_s .


SFX gu Y 4
SFX gu ·ue /_s .
SFX gu ·ue ue/_s .
SFX gu ·ue ·ue/_s .
SFX gu ·ue .ue/_s .


SFX al Y 5
SFX al l·e l .
SFX al l·e ux .
SFX al l·e le/_s .
SFX al l·e l·e/_s .
SFX al l·e l.e/_s .


SFX ll Y 21
SFX ll 0 /_s .
SFX ll ·fe fe/_s f·fe
SFX ll ·le le/_s l·le
SFX ll ·ne ne/_s n·ne
SFX ll ·se se/_s s·se
SFX ll ·te te/_s t·te
SFX ll ·fe /_s f·fe
SFX ll ·le /_s l·le
SFX ll ·ne /_s n·ne
SFX ll ·se /_s s·se
SFX ll ·te /_s t·te
SFX ll 0 /_s f·fe
SFX ll 0 /_s l·le
SFX ll 0 /_s n·ne
SFX ll 0 /_s s·se
SFX ll 0 /_s t·te
SFX ll 0 /_s f.fe
SFX ll 0 /_s l.le
SFX ll 0 /_s n.ne
SFX ll 0 /_s s.se
SFX ll 0 /_s t.te


SFX ss Y 4
SFX ss ·sse /_s .
SFX ss ·sse sse/_s .
SFX ss ·sse ·sse/_s .
SFX ss ·sse .sse/_s .


SFX lu Y 5
SFX lu ou·lle l/_s .
SFX lu ou·lle lle/_s .
SFX lu ou·lle u/_s .
SFX lu ou·lle ou·lle/_s .
SFX lu ou·lle ou.lle/_s .


SFX GB Y 3
SFX GB y ies y
SFX GB 0 es [xh]
SFX GB man men man


SFX LT Y 6
SFX LT a e/ a
SFX LT e i/ e
SFX LT en ina/ en
SFX LT o i/ o
SFX LT um a/ um
SFX LT us i/ us
SFX zA Y 50
SFX zA voir voir/ avoir
SFX zA voir yant/ avoir
SFX zA avoir eu/ avoir
SFX zA avoir eus/ avoir
SFX zA avoir eue/ avoir
SFX zA avoir eues/ avoir
SFX zA voir i/ avoir
SFX zA voir s/ avoir
SFX zA voir 0/ avoir
SFX zA voir vons/ avoir
SFX zA voir vez/ avoir
SFX zA avoir ont/ avoir
SFX zA voir vais/ avoir
SFX zA voir vait/ avoir
SFX zA voir vions/ avoir
SFX zA voir viez/ avoir
SFX zA voir vaient/ avoir
SFX zA avoir eus/ avoir
SFX zA avoir eut/ avoir
SFX zA avoir eûmes/ avoir
SFX zA avoir eûtes/ avoir
SFX zA avoir eurent/ avoir
SFX zA voir urai/ avoir
SFX zA voir uras/ avoir
SFX zA voir ura/ avoir
SFX zA voir urons/ avoir
SFX zA voir urez/ avoir
SFX zA voir uront/ avoir
SFX zA voir urais/ avoir
SFX zA voir urait/ avoir
SFX zA voir urions/ avoir
SFX zA voir uriez/ avoir
SFX zA voir uraient/ avoir
SFX zA voir ie/ avoir
SFX zA voir ies/ avoir
SFX zA voir it/ avoir
SFX zA voir yons/ avoir
SFX zA voir yez/ avoir
SFX zA voir ient/ avoir
SFX zA avoir eusse/ avoir
SFX zA avoir eussé/ avoir
SFX zA avoir eussè/ avoir
SFX zA avoir eusses/ avoir
SFX zA avoir eût/ avoir
SFX zA avoir eussions/ avoir
SFX zA avoir eussiez/ avoir
SFX zA avoir eussent/ avoir
SFX zA voir ie/ avoir
SFX zA voir yons/ avoir
SFX zA voir yez/ avoir

SFX zE Y 46
SFX zE tre tre/ être
SFX zE être étant/ être
SFX zE être été/ être
SFX zE être suis/ être
SFX zE être es/ être
SFX zE être est/ être
SFX zE être sommes/ être
SFX zE tre tes/ être
SFX zE être sont/ être
SFX zE être étais/ être
SFX zE être était/ être
SFX zE être étions/ être
SFX zE être étiez/ être
SFX zE être étaient/ être
SFX zE être fus/ être
SFX zE être fut/ être
SFX zE être fûmes/ être
SFX zE être fûtes/ être
SFX zE être furent/ être
SFX zE être serai/ être
SFX zE être seras/ être
SFX zE être sera/ être
SFX zE être serons/ être
SFX zE être serez/ être
SFX zE être seront/ être
SFX zE être serais/ être
SFX zE être serait/ être
SFX zE être serions/ être
SFX zE être seriez/ être
SFX zE être seraient/ être
SFX zE être sois/ être
SFX zE être soit/ être
SFX zE être soyons/ être
SFX zE être soyez/ être
SFX zE être soient/ être
SFX zE être fusse/ être
SFX zE être fussé/ être
SFX zE être fussè/ être
SFX zE être fusses/ être
SFX zE être fût/ être
SFX zE être fussions/ être
SFX zE être fussiez/ être
SFX zE être fussent/ être
SFX zE être sois/ être
SFX zE être soyons/ être
SFX zE être soyez/ être
