vim/st.dic
addictif·ve/,,fv
adjudicateur·rice/,,ri
agneau·elle/,,la
agressif·ve/,,fv
aiguillat/_s
aiguilleur·euse/,,rs
aigu·ue/,,ue
aindinois·e/,,_e
alizéen·ne/,,ll
ambassadeur·rice/,,ri
ambigu·ue/,,ue
ancestral·e/,,al
anecdotier·ère/,,rr
anguleux·euse/,,xz
annamite/_s
antipersonnel·le/,,ll
antisportif·ve/,,fv
apparent·e/,,_e
approbateur·rice/,,ri
arceau/_x
archiépiscopal·e/,,al
archiprêtre·sse/,,ss
argileux·euse/,,xz
arioso/LT
arrachage/_s
asphalteur·euse/,,rs
assurantiel·le/,,ll
attentif·ve/,,fv
autoexcitateur·rice/,,ri
autoroutier·ère/,,rr
avoir/zA
badinage/_s
baggy/GB
bahreïni·e/,,_e
bambocheur·euse/,,rs
barde·sse/,,ss
barlong·ue/,,gu
basochien·ne/,,ll
beau·elle/,,la
bedeau/_x
bégu·ue/,,ue
besogneux·euse/,,xz
bétonnier·ère/,,rr
biennal·e/,,al
bigouden·ène/,,en
biogène/_s
blagueur·euse/,,rs
blaireau·elle/,,la
blond·e/,,_e
body/GB
bonze·sse/,,ss
boqueteau/_x
bougre·sse/,,ss
boulevardier·ère/,,rr
branleur·euse/,,rs
bref·ève/,,ev
brossier·ère/,,rr
brouet/_s
bruineux·euse/,,xz
brunet·te/,,ll
buffle·sse/,,ss
buggy/GB
bushman/GB
businesswoman/GB
caduc·que/,,qc
cafteur·euse/,,rs
calier·ère/,,rr
canalisateur·rice/,,ri
canardeau/_x
canzone/LT
caoutchouteux·euse/,,xz
captif·ve/,,fv
capucin·e/,,_e
cardial·e/,,al
carrier·ère/,,rr
centaure·sse/,,ss
cérébelleux·euse/,,xz
ce/u'
chaînier·ère/,,rr
chamailleur·euse/,,rs
chanoine·sse/,,ss
chapiteau/_x
cherry/GB
chevrier·ère/,,rr
chimiosynthèse/_s
choupinet·te/,,ll
chuchoteur·euse/,,rs
classieux·euse/,,xz
cléché·e/,,_e
clergyman/GB
coadjuteur·rice/,,ri
coagulum/LT
cohéritier·ère/,,rr
colloïdal·e/,,al
columbarium/LT
comminutif·ve/,,fv
communicateur·rice/,,ri
complet·ète/,,et
comte·sse/,,ss
concret·ète/,,et
confectionneur·euse/,,rs
confessionnal/_x
conjonctif·ve/,,fv
consensuel·le/,,ll
consolateur·rice/,,ri
contigu·ue/,,ue
contraignant·e/,,_e
contrastif·ve/,,fv
contremaitre·sse/,,ss
contremaître·sse/,,ss
coorganisateur·rice/,,ri
cordage/_s
corticospinal·e/,,al
côtier·ère/,,rr
couenneux·euse/,,xz
couteau/_x
crash/GB
crayonneur·euse/,,rs
criterium/LT
cryptojuif·ve/,,fv
cuisinier·ère/,,rr
cuniculteur·rice/,,ri
damné·e/,,_e
dangereux·euse/,,xz
délibératif·ve/,,fv
démouleur·euse/,,rs
démystificateur·rice/,,ri
dénotationnel·le/,,ll
denturologie/_s
député·e/,,_e
desideratum/LT
dessiccatif·ve/,,fv
destructeur·rice/,,ri
désuet·ète/,,et
de/u'
diable·sse/,,ss
diagonal·e/,,al
dinghy/GB
discret·ète/,,et
disruptif·ve/,,fv
dominiquais·e/,,_e
douteux·euse/,,xz
doux·ce/,,xc
drôle·sse/,,ss
druide·sse/,,ss
eau/_x
éboueur·euse/,,rs
échotier·ère/,,rr
écriture/_s
égressif·ve/,,fv
électromoteur·rice/,,ri
éluvial·e/,,al
endurant·e/,,_e
enjambeur·euse/,,rs
épicrânien·ne/,,ll
équipier·ère/,,rr
estimatif·ve/,,fv
étau/_x
être/zE
européisme/_s
exemplum/LT
exigu·ue/,,ue
exorbitant·e/,,_e
expropriateur·rice/,,ri
extrudeur·euse/,,rs
faune·sse/,,ss
faux·sse/,,xs
féculier·ère/,,rr
fédéral·e/,,al
félibre·sse/,,ss
ferrugineux·euse/,,xz
ferry/GB
fictif·ve/,,fv
fléau/_x
folié·e/,,_e
fontenaisien·ne/,,ll
foramen/LT
formier·ère/,,rr
fou·olle/,,lu
gâcheur·euse/,,rs
gaillardise/_s
gangréneux·euse/,,xz
genou/_x
gentleman/GB
gibelin·e/,,_e
gladiateur·rice/,,ri
glénoïdal·e/,,al
gonze·sse/,,ss
grassmannien·ne/,,ll
grec·que/,,qc
grigneux·euse/,,xz
guerrier·ère/,,rr
hâbleur·euse/,,rs
hachereau/_x
heptaèdre/_s
hexavalent·e/,,_e
hobby/GB
hypercontinental·e/,,al
illyrien·ne/,,ll
impedimentum/LT
imprimitif·ve/,,fv
inaccepté·e/,,_e
incomplet·ète/,,et
indiscret·ète/,,et
industrieux·euse/,,xz
inessif/_s
informateur·rice/,,ri
inquiet·ète/,,et
intercostal·e/,,al
interpellatif·ve/,,fv
iridié·e/,,_e
irrationnel·le/,,ll
ivrogne·sse/,,ss
jambonneau/_x
je/u'
journalier·ère/,,rr
jugal·e/,,al
jumeau·elle/,,la
jusque/u'
lady/GB
latifundium/LT
la/u'
lavandiculteur·rice/,,ri
lazurite/_s
leadeur·euse/,,rs
lépreux·euse/,,xz
le/u'
libretto/LT
liteau/_x
logisticien·ne/,,ll
long·ue/,,gu
lorsque/u'
lucratif·ve/,,fv
machinal·e/,,al
mafioso/LT
maitre·sse/,,ss
maître·sse/,,ss
manufacturier·ère/,,rr
mauvais·e/,,_e
méandreux·euse/,,xz
mélampyre/_s
memorandum/LT
mémoriel·le/,,ll
meneau/_x
mésial·e/,,al
me/u'
meuleur·euse/,,rs
midshipman/GB
mire·sse/,,ss
modernisateur·rice/,,ri
morutier·ère/,,rr
mou·olle/,,lu
multinational·e/,,al
myxoedémateux·euse/xz
namibien·ne/,,ll
nankin/_s
nanomatériau/_x
néogrec·que/,,qc
ne/u'
nouveau·elle/,,la
nuraghe/LT
nymphal·e/,,al
oblong·ue/,,gu
obstructif·ve/,,fv
ogre·sse/,,ss
oléiculteur·rice/,,ri
ombiliqué·e/,,_e
onusien·ne/,,ll
oppidum/LT
oublieux·euse/,,xz
ouvreau/_x
pacquage/_s
paddy/GB
pagus/LT
palléal·e/,,al
paparazzo/LT
parapublic·que/,,qc
parraineur·euse/,,rs
passementier·ère/,,rr
pecorino/LT
pelvien·ne/,,ll
perchman/GB
périapical·e/,,al
pibale/_s
pineau/_x
piqueux·euse/,,xz
pizzaiolo/LT
pleurnichard·e/,,_e
poète·sse/,,ee
pollueur·euse/,,rs
pondérateur·rice/,,ri
portemanteau/_x
possessif·ve/,,fv
postcolonial·e/,,al
postier·ère/,,rr
postindustriel·le/,,ll
préfet·ète/,,et
presque/u'
prêtre·sse/,,ss
profe·sse/,,ss
prophète·sse/,,ee
prothèse/_s
provençal·e/,,al
provocateur·rice/,,ri
pseudomembraneux·euse/,,xz
public·que/,,qc
puceau·elle/,,la
puisque/u'
pulsatif·ve/,,fv
pythagoricien·ne/,,ll
quantum/LT
quelque/u'
quelque/u'_s
que/u'
quiet·ète/,,et
quoique/u'
qu/u'
rampeau/_x
randonneur·euse/,,rs
reconnaissant·e/,,_e
recordman/GB
régulateur·rice/,,ri
repavage/_s
replet·ète/,,et
réplétif·ve/,,fv
rewriteur·euse/,,rs
rhumatismal·e/,,al
rosier·ère/,,rr
royalty/GB
ruisseau/_x
sablonneux·euse/,,xz
saducéen·ne/,,ll
scriptorium/LT
sculpteur·rice/,,ri
sec·que/,,qc
secret·ète/,,et
sénior·e/,,_e
senseï/_s
se/u'
singulatif·ve/,,fv
slash/GB
snipeur·euse/,,rs
soigneux·euse/,,xz
solo/LT
sourcilier·ère/,,rr
souriceau/_x
spinoriel·le/,,ll
sportswoman/GB
stimulus/LT
subaigu·ue/,,ue
subnormal·e/,,al
suraigu·ue/,,ue
surcreusement/_s
sustentateur·rice/,,ri
taximan/GB
tellureux·euse/,,xz
tensioactif·ve/,,fv
te/u'
thaï·e/,,_e
tien·ne/,,ll
toccata/LT
tondeur·euse/,,rs
tory/GB
touchau/_x
tourangeau·elle/,,la
tourtereau·elle/,,la
trac/_s
trijumeau·elle/,,la
tufier·ère/,,rr
turc·que/,,qc
tyranneau/_x
unifamilial·e/,,al
uropygien·ne/,,ll
vasoconstricteur·rice/,,ri
velouteux·euse/,,xz
vicomte·sse/,,ss
vieux·eille/,,xl
vivianite/_s
vocero/LT
voeu/_x
vogoul·e/,,_e
volailleur·euse/,,rs
yachtman/GB
yeoman/GB
